District of Columbia statutes.
5-743

Board to determine amount of pension relief.

The District of Columbia Retirement Board is hereby empowered to determine and fix the amount of the pension relief allowance heretofore and hereafter granted to any person under and in accordance with the provisions of subchapter I of this chapter.

History

July 1, 1930, 46 Stat. 841, ch. 783, § 6
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 14, 52 DCR 2638

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-745.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-603.
1973 Ed., § 4-505.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “District of Columbia Retirement Board” for “Mayor”.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.